Illinois, session 104th, HB4367.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 113-8 and by adding Article 124C 6as follows: 7    (725 ILCS 5/113-8)8    Sec. 113-8. Advisement concerning status as a noncitizen.9    (a) Before the acceptance of a plea of guilty, guilty but 10mentally ill, or nolo contendere to a misdemeanor or felony 11offense, the court shall give the following advisement to the 12defendant in open court:13    "If you are not a citizen of the United States, you are 14hereby advised that conviction of the offense for which you 15have been charged may have the consequence of deportation, 16exclusion from admission to the United States, or denial of 17naturalization under the laws of the United States.".18    (b) If the defendant is arraigned on or after the 19effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st General 20Assembly, and the court fails to advise the defendant as 21required by subsection (a) of this Section, and the defendant 22shows that conviction of the offense to which the defendant 23pleaded guilty, guilty but mentally ill, or nolo contendere   HB4367- 2 -LRB104 17132 RLC 30551 b1may have the consequence for the defendant of deportation, 2exclusion from admission to the United States, or denial of 3naturalization under the laws of the United States, the court, 4upon the defendant's motion, shall vacate the judgment and 5permit the defendant to withdraw the plea of guilty, guilty 6but mentally ill, or nolo contendere and enter a plea of not 7guilty. A defendant who, prior to the effective date of this 8amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, had been barred 9by time limitations from filing a motion to vacate, may pursue 10remedies under this Section or Section 124C-1. The motion 11shall be filed within 2 years of the date of the defendant's 12conviction.13(Source: P.A. 101-409, eff. 1-1-20; 102-1030, eff. 5-27-22.) 14    (725 ILCS 5/Art. 124C heading new)15ARTICLE 124C. PETITION TO VACATE CERTAIN CONVICTIONS IN THE 16TRIAL COURT 17    (725 ILCS 5/124C-1 new)18    Sec. 124C-1. Petition to vacate certain convictions in the 19trial court. 20    (a) In this Section, "conviction" has the meaning given in 218 U.S.C. 1101(a)(48).22    (b) Any person may file a petition to vacate a conviction 23or sentence under this Section, regardless of criminal custody 24status or citizenship or immigration status, as defined in   HB4367- 3 -LRB104 17132 RLC 30551 b1Section 10 of the Illinois TRUST Act, if the person asserts 2that:3        (1) the conviction or sentence is legally invalid due 4    to prejudicial error damaging the petitioner's ability to 5    meaningfully understand, defend against, or knowingly 6    accept the actual or potential adverse immigration 7    consequences of a conviction or sentence; a finding of 8    legal invalidity may, but need not, include a finding of 9    ineffective assistance of counsel, and includes, but is 10    not limited to, failure to admonish noncitizens under 11    Section 113-8 of this Code or Illinois Supreme Court Rule 12    402; or13        (2) newly discovered evidence of actual innocence 14    exists that requires vacation of the conviction or 15    sentence as a matter of law or in the interests of justice.16    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a petition 17under subsection (b) shall be deemed timely filed at any time. 18The time limitations for petitions filed in the trial court 19under Section 122-1 do not apply to a petition filed under 20subsection (b).21    (d) A petition filed under this Section shall identify the 22proceeding in which the petitioner was convicted or sentenced, 23give the date of the rendition of the final judgment 24complained of, and clearly set forth the respects in which 25either the petitioner asserts that his or her rights were 26violated under subsection (b) or that newly discovered   HB4367- 4 -LRB104 17132 RLC 30551 b1evidence of actual innocence exists that requires vacation of 2the conviction or sentence as a matter of law or in the 3interest of justice. The petition may have attached to it 4affidavits, records, or other evidence supporting its 5allegations or may state why the same are not attached.6    (e) If the petition alleges that the petitioner is unable 7to pay the costs of the proceeding, the court may order that 8the petitioner be permitted to proceed as a poor person and 9order a transcript of the proceedings delivered to petitioner 10in accordance with Illinois Supreme Court Rules. If the 11petitioner is without counsel and alleges being without means 12to procure counsel, the petitioner shall state whether 13appointment of counsel is being requested. If appointment of 14counsel is being requested, the court shall appoint counsel if 15satisfied that the petitioner has no means to procure counsel.16    (f) All petitions filed under this Section shall be 17entitled to a hearing. Upon the request of the petitioner, the 18court may hold the hearing without the personal presence of 19the petitioner if it finds good cause as to why the petitioner 20cannot be present. If the State's Attorney for the 21jurisdiction in which the petition is filed does not file an 22objection to the petition, the court may grant the petition to 23vacate the conviction or sentence without a hearing.24        (1) Within 90 days after the filing and docketing of 25    each petition, the court shall examine the petition and 26    enter an order on the petition setting for calendar a   HB4367- 5 -LRB104 17132 RLC 30551 b1    hearing date on the petition, except that this timeline 2    shall be 45 days in any case in which the petitioner is in 3    the custody of Immigration and Customs Enforcement or 4    otherwise faces imminent removal from the United States.5        (2) Within 30 days after the entry of an order under 6    paragraph (1) of this subsection (f), or within such 7    further time as the court may set, the State may file an 8    answer.9    No other or further pleadings shall be filed except as the 10court may order on its own motion or on that of either party. 11The court may in its discretion grant leave, at any stage of 12the proceeding prior to entry of judgment, to withdraw the 13petition. The court may in its discretion make such order as to 14amendment of the petition or any other pleading, or as to 15pleading over, or filing further pleadings, or extending the 16time of filing any pleading other than the original petition, 17as shall be appropriate, just, and reasonable and as is 18generally provided in civil cases.19    (g) When ruling on the petition:20        (1) The court shall grant the petition to vacate the 21    conviction or sentence if the petitioner establishes, by a 22    preponderance of the evidence, the existence of any of the 23    grounds for relief specified in subsection (b). For a 24    motion made under paragraph (1) of subsection (b), the 25    petitioner shall also establish that the conviction or 26    sentence being challenged is currently causing or has the   HB4367- 6 -LRB104 17132 RLC 30551 b1    potential to cause removal or the denial of an application 2    for an immigration benefit, lawful status, or 3    naturalization.4        (2) A court's judicial admonishment under Section 5    113-8 at the time of the conviction or sentencing at issue 6    in the petition shall not be considered:7            (A) a sufficient basis to cure or correct the 8        prejudicial error damaging the petitioner's ability to 9        meaningfully understand, defend against, or knowingly 10        accept the actual or potential adverse immigration 11        consequences of a conviction or sentence;12            (B) mitigation for a finding of ineffective 13        assistance of counsel relating to the same conviction 14        or sentencing under this Section; or15            (C) dispositive as to whether the petitioner was 16        aware that the petitioner's criminal conviction or 17        sentence has adverse immigration consequences for 18        purposes of paragraph (2) of subsection (b). 19        (3) There is a presumption of legal invalidity for the 20    purposes of paragraph (1) of subsection (b) if the 21    petitioner pleaded guilty or nolo contendere under a 22    statute that provided that, upon completion of specific 23    requirements, proceedings would be dismissed without 24    judgment if the petitioner complied with these 25    requirements, and if the disposition under the statute has 26    been, or potentially could be, used as a basis for adverse   HB4367- 7 -LRB104 17132 RLC 30551 b1    immigration consequences.2        (4) If the court grants the petition to vacate a 3    conviction or sentence obtained through a plea of guilty 4    or nolo contendere, the court shall allow the petitioner 5    to withdraw the plea.6        (5) When ruling on a petition under this Section, the 7    court shall specify the basis for its conclusion. For 8    petitions under paragraph (1) of subsection (b), the only 9    finding that the court is required to make is whether the 10    conviction is legally invalid due to prejudicial error 11    damaging the petitioner's ability to meaningfully 12    understand, defend against, or knowingly accept the actual 13    or potential adverse immigration consequences of a 14    conviction or sentence.15    (h) An order granting or denying the petition is 16appealable, and any final judgment entered upon the petition 17shall be reviewed in the manner provided under the rules of the 18Supreme Court.19    (i) A court may issue a specific finding of ineffective 20assistance of counsel as a result of a motion brought under 21paragraph (1) of subsection (b) only if the attorney found to 22be ineffective was given, under Illinois Supreme Court Rule 23102, timely advance notice of the petition hearing by the 24petitioner or the State's Attorney for the jurisdiction in 25which the petition is filed.26    (j) If the court finds in favor of the petitioner, it shall   HB4367- 8 -LRB104 17132 RLC 30551 b1enter an appropriate order with respect to the judgment or 2sentence in the former proceedings and such supplementary 3orders as to rearraignment, retrial, custody, conditions of 4pretrial release or discharge as may be necessary and proper.5    (k) Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's 6Attorney's office of petitions filed under this Section as 7required in Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime Victims and 8Witnesses Act.9    (l) Remedies under this Section shall apply to convictions 10and sentences entered before, on, or after the effective date 11of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.  1213    Section 10. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 14changing Section 2-1401 as follows: 15    (735 ILCS 5/2-1401)  (from Ch. 110, par. 2-1401)16    Sec. 2-1401. Relief from judgments. 17    (a) Relief from final orders and judgments, after 30 days 18from the entry thereof, may be had upon petition as provided in 19this Section. Writs of error coram nobis and coram vobis, 20bills of review, and bills in the nature of bills of review are 21abolished. All relief heretofore obtainable and the grounds 22for such relief heretofore available, whether by any of the 23foregoing remedies or otherwise, shall be available in every 24case, by proceedings hereunder, regardless of the nature of   HB4367- 9 -LRB104 17132 RLC 30551 b1the order or judgment from which relief is sought or of the 2proceedings in which it was entered. Except as provided in the 3Illinois Parentage Act of 2015, there shall be no distinction 4between actions and other proceedings, statutory or otherwise, 5as to availability of relief, grounds for relief, or the 6relief obtainable.7    (b) The petition must be filed in the same proceeding in 8which the order or judgment was entered but is not a 9continuation thereof. The petition must be supported by an 10affidavit or other appropriate showing as to matters not of 11record. A petition to reopen a foreclosure proceeding must 12include as parties to the petition, but is not limited to, all 13parties in the original action in addition to the current 14record title holders of the property, current occupants, and 15any individual or entity that had a recorded interest in the 16property before the filing of the petition. All parties to the 17petition shall be notified as provided by rule.18    (b-5) A movant may present a meritorious claim under this 19Section if the allegations in the petition establish each of 20the following by a preponderance of the evidence:21        (1) the movant was convicted of a forcible felony;22        (2) the movant's participation in the offense was 23    related to him or her previously having been a victim of 24    domestic violence or gender-based violence;25        (3) there is substantial evidence of domestic violence 26    or gender-based violence against the movant that was not   HB4367- 10 -LRB104 17132 RLC 30551 b1    presented at the movant's sentencing hearing;2        (4) (blank); and3        (5) the evidence of domestic violence or gender-based 4    violence against the movant is material and noncumulative 5    to other evidence offered at the sentencing hearing, or 6    previous hearing under this Section filed on or after the 7    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 8    Assembly, and is of such a conclusive character that it 9    would likely change the sentence imposed by the original 10    trial court.11    Nothing in this subsection (b-5) shall prevent a movant 12from applying for any other relief under this Section or any 13other law otherwise available to him or her. This subsection 14(b-5) applies to all eligible convictions, including, but not 15limited to, if the judge renders the sentence based on a 16negotiated plea agreement. Relief under this Section allows 17for the modification of the length of sentence without 18affecting the conviction. 19    As used in this subsection (b-5):20    "Domestic violence" means abuse as defined in Section 103 21of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986.22    "Forcible felony" has the meaning ascribed to the term in 23Section 2-8 of the Criminal Code of 2012.24    "Gender-based violence" includes evidence of victimization 25as a trafficking victim, as defined by paragraph (10) of 26subsection (a) of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012,   HB4367- 11 -LRB104 17132 RLC 30551 b1evidence of victimization under the Illinois Domestic Violence 2Act of 1986, evidence of victimization under the Stalking No 3Contact Order Act, or evidence of victimization of any offense 4under Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012, irrespective of 5criminal prosecution or conviction. 6    "Intimate partner" means a spouse or former spouse, 7persons who have or allegedly have had a child in common, or 8persons who have or have had a dating or engagement 9relationship.10    "Substantial evidence" means evidence that a reasonable 11mind might accept as adequate to support a conclusion. 12    (b-10) A movant may present a meritorious claim under this 13Section if the allegations in the petition establish each of 14the following by a preponderance of the evidence:15        (A) she was convicted of a forcible felony;16        (B) her participation in the offense was a direct 17    result of her suffering from postpartum depression or 18    postpartum psychosis;19        (C) no evidence of postpartum depression or postpartum 20    psychosis was presented by a qualified medical person at 21    trial or sentencing, or both;22        (D) she was unaware of the mitigating nature of the 23    evidence or, if aware, was at the time unable to present 24    this defense due to suffering from postpartum depression 25    or postpartum psychosis, or, at the time of trial or 26    sentencing, neither was a recognized mental illness and as   HB4367- 12 -LRB104 17132 RLC 30551 b1    such, she was unable to receive proper treatment; and2        (E) evidence of postpartum depression or postpartum 3    psychosis as suffered by the person is material and 4    noncumulative to other evidence offered at the time of 5    trial or sentencing, and it is of such a conclusive 6    character that it would likely change the sentence imposed 7    by the original court.8    Nothing in this subsection (b-10) prevents a person from 9applying for any other relief under this Article or any other 10law otherwise available to her. This subsection (b-10) applies 11to all eligible convictions, including, but not limited to, if 12the judge renders the sentence based on a negotiated plea 13agreement. Relief under this Section allows for the 14modification of the length of sentence without affecting the 15conviction. 16    As used in this subsection (b-10):17    "Postpartum depression" means a mood disorder which 18strikes many women during and after pregnancy and usually 19occurs during pregnancy and up to 12 months after delivery. 20This depression can include anxiety disorders.21    "Postpartum psychosis" means an extreme form of postpartum 22depression which can occur during pregnancy and up to 12 23months after delivery. This can include losing touch with 24reality, distorted thinking, delusions, auditory and visual 25hallucinations, paranoia, hyperactivity and rapid speech, or 26mania.  HB4367- 13 -LRB104 17132 RLC 30551 b1    (c) Except as provided in Section 20b of the Adoption Act 2and Section 2-32 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, in a 3petition based upon Section 116-3 of the Code of Criminal 4Procedure of 1963 or subsection (b-5), or (b-10), or (c-5) of 5this Section, or in a motion to vacate and expunge convictions 6under the Cannabis Control Act as provided by subsection (i) 7of Section 5.2 of the Criminal Identification Act, the 8petition must be filed not later than 2 years after the entry 9of the order or judgment. Time during which the person seeking 10relief is under legal disability or duress or the ground for 11relief is fraudulently concealed shall be excluded in 12computing the period of 2 years.13    (c-5) Any individual may at any time file a petition and 14institute proceedings under this Section if the individual's 15his or her final order or judgment, which was entered based on 16a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, has potential 17consequences under federal immigration law. This subsection 18applies to orders or judgments entered before, on, or after 19the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 20Assembly. 21    (d) The filing of a petition under this Section does not 22affect the order or judgment, or suspend its operation.23    (e) Unless lack of jurisdiction affirmatively appears from 24the record proper, the vacation or modification of an order or 25judgment pursuant to the provisions of this Section does not 26affect the right, title, or interest in or to any real or   HB4367- 14 -LRB104 17132 RLC 30551 b1personal property of any person, not a party to the original 2action, acquired for value after the entry of the order or 3judgment but before the filing of the petition, nor affect any 4right of any person not a party to the original action under 5any certificate of sale issued before the filing of the 6petition, pursuant to a sale based on the order or judgment. 7When a petition is filed pursuant to this Section to reopen a 8foreclosure proceeding, notwithstanding the provisions of 9Section 15-1701 of this Code, the purchaser or successor 10purchaser of real property subject to a foreclosure sale who 11was not a party to the mortgage foreclosure proceedings is 12entitled to remain in possession of the property until the 13foreclosure action is defeated or the previously foreclosed 14defendant redeems from the foreclosure sale if the purchaser 15has been in possession of the property for more than 6 months. 16    (f) Nothing contained in this Section affects any existing 17right to relief from a void order or judgment, or to employ any 18existing method to procure that relief.19(Source: P.A. 102-639, eff. 8-27-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 20103-403, eff. 1-1-24; 103-968, eff. 1-1-25.)